North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131E. Health Care Facilities and Services.
Article 9. Certificate of Need.
§ 131E-189.
Withdrawal of a certificate of need.

The Department shall specify in each certificate of need the time the holder has to make the service or equipment available or to complete the project and the timetable to be followed. The timetable shall be the one proposed by the holder of the certificate of need unless the Department specifies a different timetable in its decision letter. The holder of the certificate shall submit such periodic reports on his progress in meeting the timetable as may be required by the Department. If no progress report is provided or, after reviewing the progress, the Department determines that the holder of the certificate is not meeting the timetable and the holder cannot demonstrate that it is making good faith efforts to meet the timetable, the Department may withdraw the certificate. If the Department determines that the holder of the certificate is making a good faith effort to meet the timetable, the Department may, at the request of the holder, extend the timetable for a specified period.

The Department may withdraw any certificate of need, if the holder of the certificate fails to develop the service in a manner consistent with the representations made in the application or with any condition or conditions the Department placed on the certificate of need.

The Department may immediately withdraw any certificate of need if the holder of the certificate, before completion of the project or operation of the facility, transfers ownership or control of the facility, the project, or the certificate of need. Any transfer after that time will be subject to the requirement that the service be provided consistent with the representations made in the application and any applicable conditions the Department placed on the certificate of need. Transfers resulting from death or personal illness or other good cause, as determined by the Department, shall not result in withdrawal if the Department receives prior written notice of the transfer and finds good cause. Transfers resulting from death shall not result in withdrawal.

Notwithstanding subsections (a), (b), or (c) of this section, a certificate of need issued by the Department for the construction of a health service facility on or after October 1, 2021, expires if the holder of the certificate of need fails to execute or commit to a contract for design services for the project authorized by the certificate of need within the following time frames:

For a project that costs over fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), the holder of the certificate of need shall execute or commit to a contract for design services for the project authorized by the certificate of need within four years after the date the Department’s decision to approve the certificate of need for that project becomes final.

For a project that costs fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) or less, the holder of the certificate of need shall execute or commit to a contract for design services for the project authorized by the certificate of need within two years after the date the Department’s decision to approve the certificate of need for that project becomes final.

Notwithstanding subsections (a), (b), or (c) of this section, a certificate of need issued by the Department for the construction of a health service facility prior to October 1, 2021, expires if the holder of the certificate of need fails to execute or commit to a contract for design services for the project authorized by the certificate of need within the following time frames:

For a project that costs over fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), the holder of the certificate of need shall execute or commit to a contract for design services for the project authorized by the certificate of need by October 1, 2025.

For a project that costs fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) or less, the holder of the certificate of need shall execute or commit to a contract for design services for the project authorized by the certificate of need by October 1, 2023.

Notwithstanding subsections (d) and (e) of this section, certificates of need that (i) are issued for the construction of a health service facility prior to October 1, 2021, and (ii) have a specific deadline to execute or commit to a contract for design services for the project authorized by the certificate of need will not expire unless the holder fails to execute or commit to a contract for design services by the deadline specified in the certificate of need.

In the event the holder of a certificate of need is unable to execute or commit to a contract for design services for the project due to developments beyond the control of the holder of the certificate of need or for other good cause, the time for performance shall be extended by a period equal to the period during which performance of the obligation has been delayed or failed to be performed.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1182, s. 2; 1981, c. 651, s. 12; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1987, c. 511, s. 1; 1993, c. 7, s. 10; 2021-129, s. 2.

§ 131E-190.
Enforcement and sanctions.

Only those new institutional health services which are found by the Department to be needed as provided in this Article and granted certificates of need shall be offered or developed within the State.

No formal commitments made for financing, construction, or acquisition regarding the offering or development of a new institutional health service shall be made by any person unless a certificate of need for such service or activities has been granted.

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 7, s. 11.

If any person proceeds to offer or develop a new institutional health service without having first obtained a certificate of need for such services, the penalty for such violation of this Article and rules hereunder may include the withholding of federal and State funds under Titles V, XVIII, and XIX of the Social Security Act for reimbursement of capital and operating expenses related to the provision of the new institutional health service.

The Department may revoke or suspend the license of any person who proceeds to offer or develop a new institutional health service without having first obtained a certificate of need for such services.

The Department may assess a civil penalty of not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) against any person who knowingly offers or develops any new institutional health service within the meaning of this Article without a certificate of need issued under this Article and the rules pertaining thereto, or in violation of the terms or conditions of such a certificate, whenever it determines a violation has occurred and each time the service is provided in violation of this provision. In determining the amount of the penalty the Department shall consider the degree and extent of harm caused by the violation and the cost of rectifying the damage. A person who is assessed a penalty shall be notified of the penalty by registered or certified mail. The notice shall state the reasons for the penalty. If a person fails to pay a penalty, the Department shall refer the matter to the Attorney General for collection. For the purpose of this subsection, the word “person” shall not include an individual in his capacity as an officer, director, or employee of a person as otherwise defined in this Article.The clear proceeds of penalties provided for in this subsection shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

No agency of the State or any of its political subdivisions may appropriate or grant funds or financially assist in any way a person, applicant, or facility which is or whose project is in violation of this Article.

If any person proceeds to offer or develop a new institutional health service without having first obtained a certificate of need for such services, the Secretary of Health and Human Services or any person aggrieved, as defined by G.S. 150B-2(6), may bring a civil action for injunctive relief, temporary or permanent, against the person offering, developing or operating any new institutional health service. The action may be brought in the superior court of any county in which the health service facility is located or in the superior court of Wake County.

If the Department determines that the recipient of a certificate of need, or its successor, is operating a service which materially differs from the representations made in its application for that certificate of need, the Department may bring an action in Wake County Superior Court or the superior court of any county in which the certificate of need is to be utilized for injunctive relief, temporary or permanent, requiring the recipient, or its successor, to materially comply with the representations in its application. The Department may also bring an action in Wake County Superior Court or the superior court of any county in which the certificate of need is to be utilized to enforce the provisions of this subsection and G.S. 131E-181(b) and the rules adopted in accordance with this subsection and G.S. 131E-181(b).

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1182, s. 2; 1981, c. 651, s. 13; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 968, s. 2; 1987, c. 511, s. 1; 1991, c. 692, s. 9; 1993, c. 7, s. 11; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-215, s. 80.

§ 131E-191.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 511, s. 1.

§ 131E-191.1.
Lobbyists prohibited from serving on the North Carolina State Health Coordinating Council.

No person registered as a lobbyist under Chapter 120C of the General Statutes shall be appointed to or serve on the North Carolina State Health Coordinating Council. No person previously registered as a lobbyist under Chapter 120C of the General Statutes shall be appointed to or serve on the North Carolina State Health Coordinating Council within 120 days after the expiration of the lobbyist’s registration.

History.

2009-477, s. 2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted “Article 8 of Chapter 163A” for “Chapter 120C” in the first sentence.

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1 repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references in the first sentence.

§ 131E-192.

Reserved for future codification purposes.